Utah statutes.
65A-6-7.   Mineral information to be furnished -- Confidentiality.
(1)  The division may require the lessee to furnish any information necessary
to carry out the duties of this chapter, including geological and mine maps,
well logs, and assays.
(2)  Any information submitted to the division which the lessee and the
division agree is of a proprietary nature shall be classified as protected and
may not be released without written permission from the lessee.
